Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-709
School work; annual exhibit; how conducted; premiums.

There may be held at the county fair or other place in each county, under the supervision and direction of the county board of commissioners or county board of supervisors or its designee, an exhibit of school work done in each school district of the county during the current school year. The nature and character of the exhibit shall be determined by the county board. The county board may annually offer and award premiums intended to stimulate the interest in school affairs. A list of premiums to be awarded shall be mailed by the county board or its designee to the teacher, principal, or superintendent of each public, private, denominational, and parochial school in each school district in the county on or before January 15 of each year in which an exhibit shall be held.

Laws 1919, c. 247, § 1, p. 1016;

C.S.1922, § 6543;

Laws 1927, c. 89, § 1, p. 258;

C.S.1929, § 79-2120;

R.S.1943, § 79-2129;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 177, p. 750;

Laws 1963, c. 486, § 1, p. 1557;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,139;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 383;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 85.